North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 16. Form of Conveyances.

§ 146-74.
Approval of conveyances.

Every proposed conveyance in fee, including conveyances by gift, of State lands shall be submitted to the Governor and Council of State for their approval. If the proposed conveyance is of State lands with an appraised value of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), and it is for other than a transportation purpose, the Council of State shall consult with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations before making a final decision on the proposed conveyance. Upon approval of the proposed conveyance in fee by the Governor and Council of State, a deed for the land being conveyed shall be executed in the manner prescribed in this Article.

History.

1957, c. 584, s. 7; G.S., ss. 143-147; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1116, s. 97; 1993, c. 561, s. 32(b).

Local Modification.

Bladen: 2015-230, s. 3; 2018-71, s. 5; Gates: 2013-374; Granville: 2018-71, s. 1; Pender: 2019-137, s.1; Town of Butner: 2019-137, s. 5; Town of Wrightsville Beach: 2018-73, s. 1; Davie County Board of Commissioners: 2016-89, ss. 1-3.

§ 146-75.
Execution; signature; attestation; seal.

Each such conveyance in fee shall be in the usual form of deeds of conveyance of real property and shall be executed in the name of the State of North Carolina, signed in the name of the State by the Governor, and attested by the Secretary of State; and the great seal of the State of North Carolina shall be affixed thereto.

History.

1929, c. 143, s. 2; G.S., s. 143-148; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-76.
Exclusive method of conveying State lands.

The manner and method of conveying State lands herein set out shall be the exclusive and only method of conveying State lands in fee. Any conveyance thereof by any other person or executed in any other manner or by any other method shall not be effective to convey the interest or estate of the State in such land.

History.

1929, c. 143, s. 4; G.S., s. 143-150; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-77.
Admission to registration in counties.

Each such conveyance shall be admitted to registration in the several counties of the State upon the probate required by law for deeds of corporations.

History.

1929, c. 143, s. 3; G.S., s. 143-149; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-78.
Validation of conveyances of state-owned lands.

All conveyances heretofore made by the Governor, attested by the Secretary of State, and authorized by the Council of State, in the manner provided by

G.S. 146-74

and 146-75 of any lands, the title to which was vested in the State for the use of any State institution, department, or agency, or vested in the State for any other purpose, are hereby ratified and validated.

History.

1917, c. 129; C.S., s. 7524; 1951, c. 18; 1957, c. 584, s. 7; G.S., s. 143-146; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.